Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1724
Employer or
other payor; failure to withhold and remit income; effect.

Any employer or other payor who fails to withhold and remit any
income of an obligor receiving income from the employer or other payor, after
proper notice as provided in section 43-1723, shall be required to pay the stated amount to the State Disbursement Unit.
The county attorney or authorized attorney may file an action in district
court to enforce this section. The court may sanction an employer or other
payor twenty-five dollars per day, up to five hundred dollars per incident,
for failure to comply with proper notice.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 44;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 33;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 18;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 36.